hunspell/hr_HR/hr_HR.dic
akril/205
algoritam/259
anatom/235
animizam/247
antikršćanin/243
apelativ/205
Armenac/256
Atenjanin/243
atom/238
Bačvanin/243
badalj/247
Banaćanin/243
betatron/221
biheviorizam/247
Biograđanin/243
borac/256
brđanin/243
bugarski/231
butirometar/257
cenobij/244
ciganin/243
čangrizavac/256
dahtaj/205
darodavac/256
debeljko/246
dobjeći/201
dokumentarac/247
domicilijat/238
domoći/201
doreći/199
doseći/201
dostići/201
dotaći/199
dotući/196
dovući/196
dušmanin/243
Efežanin/243
egoizam/247
epitaf/205
europeizam/247
Europljanin/243
Galilejac/247
gavran/221
grabljivac/256
harpun/238
Hercegovac/256
Holanđanin/243
ići/195
ilirizam/247
Indonežanin/243
interesent/222
isjeći/202
ispeći/196
ispomoći/201
ispreći/201
ispresjeći/202
istaći/199
isteći/199
istući/196
izbojak/247
izdići/201
izmaći/199
iznići/199
izreći/197
izvrći/201
izvući/196
Jamajčanin/245
Jordanac/256
kablar/223
Katalonac/256
keš/205
Kijevljanin/243
klistir/238
komercijalizam/247
koproducent/223
Korifej/243
Križevčanin/243
kvadrant/205
lakomac/256
Lošinjanin/243
maći/199
magnezijdiborid/205
maniheizam/247
minus/205
mještanin/243
mravac/256
mršavko/246
nabreći/199
naleći/201
namaći/197
naočnjak/205
napeći/196
napući/199
nasjeći/202
nataći/199
nateći/197
natući/196
navići/199
navući/196
nekršćanin/243
neologizam/247
nići/196
Njujorčanin/243
obrađivač/223
obreći/199
obući/196
odbjeći/201
odmaći/199
odreći/197
odsjeći/202
odvući/196
omaći/199
onemoći/201
opeći/196
operativac/256
opseći/201
osamljenik/227
oteći/198
otući/196
Parižanin/243
peći/203
pehar/205
permeametar/256
pobjeći/201
podleći/201
podsjeći/202
podsrig/205
podvrći/201
podvući/196
pokrovac/247
Polinežanin/243
pomaći/199
pomoći/201
popeći/196
poreći/199
posjeći/202
postići/201
poteći/198
potepuh/217
potpomoći/201
potući/196
preobući/196
presjeći/202
prestići/201
presvući/196
preteći/198
pretući/196
prezbiterijanac/256
pribjeći/201
pričesnik/227
prileći/201
pripeći/199
priseći/201
priteći/198
privići/199
proisteći/197
promaći/199
proreći/197
prosjeći/202
proteći/198
provaljivač/223
pučanin/243
pući/199
racionalizam/247
rasjeći/202
rasteći/201
razleći/201
razmaći/199
razvrat/205
razvući/196
Rimljanin/243
sadomazohist/222
sasjeći/202
sastavak/247
sažeći/201
sjeći/204
slalom/238
smaći/199
smoći/201
snješko/242
speći/196
spektar/256
steći/198
stići/201
suđenica/227
sugrađanin/243
suspreći/201
svući/196
Šangajac/256
šašavko/246
tabak/205
teći/203
Teksašanin/243
Tirolac/256
trgovčić/217
Trogiranin/243
tući/203
umaći/199
ureći/197
ushit/205
usjeći/202
ustupak/247
uteći/197
utući/196
uzdići/201
užeći/201
varošanin/243
vodopad/205
vući/203
zadići/201
Zadranin/243
zajedljivac/256
zamaći/199
zapeći/196
zapriseći/201
zasjeći/202
zataći/199
zatući/196
zavrći/201
zvukomjer/205
župljanin/243
